pt-PT: Mobiliário > Mobiliário de bebé e criança > Acessórios para berços e alcofas: Forros e coberturas para alcofas e berços; Colchões para alcofas e berços; Suportes para alcofas e berços; Lençóis para alcofas e protetores de colchão; Almofadas e cunhas de suporte para alcofas; Capotas e redes mosquiteiras
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > เฟอร์นิเจอร์สำหรับทารกและเด็กเล็ก > อุปกรณ์เปลเด็ก: แผ่นรองและที่คลุมเปลเด็กแรกเกิด; ฟูกเปลเด็กแรกเกิดและเปลไกว; ขาตั้งเปลเด็กแรกเกิดและเปลไกว; ผ้าปูและแผ่นรองกันเปื้อนฟูกเปลเด็กแรกเกิด; หมอนหนุนและหมอนจัดท่านอนเปลเด็กแรกเกิด; มุ้งและกระโจมกันยุง
bg-BG: Мебели > Мебели за бебета и малки деца > Аксесоари за кошари и люлки: Обиколници и покривала за кошарки и люлки; Матраци за кошари и люлки; Стойки за кошари и люлки; Чаршафи за кошара и протектори за матраци; Поддържащи възглавници за кошара и клинове; Балдахини и мрежи против комари
de: Möbel > Baby- & Kleinkindmöbel > Wiegen- & Stubenwagenzubehör: Stubenwagen- & Wiegeneinlagen & -bezüge; Matratzen für Stubenwagen & Wiegen; Stubenwagen- & Wiegenständer; Bettlaken & Matratzenschoner für Stubenwagen; Stützkissen & Keilkissen für Stubenwagen; Betthimmel & Moskitonetze
sv: Möbler > Möbler för bebisar och småbarn > Tillbehör till babykorgar och vaggor: Foder & överdrag till moseskorgar & vaggor; Madrasser för moseskorgar & vaggor; Stativ för moseskorgar & vaggor; Lakan & madrasskydd för moseskorgar; Stödkuddar & kilar för moseskorgar; Sänghimlar & myggnät
cs: Nábytek > Nábytek pro děti a kojence > Dětské koše a kolébky – příslušenství: Vložky a potahy do košíků a kolébek; Matrace do košíků a kolébek; Stojany na košíky a kolébky; Prostěradla a chrániče matrací do košíků; Opěrné a klínové polštáře do košíků; Nebesa a moskytiéry
pt-BR: Móveis > Móveis para bebês > Acessórios para berços e moisés: Forros e capas para moisés e berços; Colchões para moisés e berços; Suportes para moisés e berços; Lençóis e protetores de colchão para moisés; Travesseiros e cunhas de suporte para moisés; Dosséis e mosquiteiros
zh-CN: 家具 > 婴幼儿家具 > 摇篮车/摇篮配件: 摇篮和婴儿床内衬及罩子; 摇篮和婴儿床床垫; 摇篮和婴儿床支架; 摇篮床单和床垫保护套; 摇篮支撑枕和斜坡垫; 顶篷和蚊帐
nb: Møbler > Møbler for baby og barn > Tilbehør til babysenger og vugger: Trekk og beskyttelse til babykurv og vugge; Madrasser til babykurv og vugge; Stativer til babykurv og vugge; Laken og madrassbeskyttere til babykurv; Støtteputer og kiler til babykurv; Sengehimler og myggnett
ja: 家具 > ベビー用家具 > バシネット・ゆりかご用品: バシネット・クレードルライナー・カバー; バシネット・クレードルマットレス; バシネット・クレードルスタンド; バシネットシーツ・マットレスプロテクター; バシネットサポートピロー・ウェッジ; キャノピー・蚊帳
zh-TW: 家具 > 嬰幼兒家具 > 嬰兒睡藍/搖籃配件: 搖籃內襯與保護套; 搖籃床墊; 搖籃底座; 搖籃床單與保潔墊; 搖籃支撐枕與楔形枕; 頂篷與蚊帳
ru: Мебель > Мебель для детей и младенцев > Аксессуары для колыбелей и люлек: Бортики и чехлы для люлек и колыбелей; Матрасы для люлек и колыбелей; Стойки для люлек и колыбелей; Простыни и наматрасники для люлек; Поддерживающие подушки и валики для люлек; Балдахины и москитные сетки
da: Møbler > Møbler til baby og småbørn > Kurvevugge og vugge – tilbehør: Indlæg og betræk til babylifte og vugger; Madrasser til babylifte og vugger; Stativer til babylifte og vugger; Lagner og madrasbeskyttere til babylifte; Støttepuder og kiler til babylifte; Sengehimle og myggenet
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Pohištvo za dojenčke in malčke > Dodatki za košarice in zibelke: Podloge in pokrivala za košarice in zibelke; Blazine za košarice in zibelke; Stojala za košarice in zibelke; Rjuhe in zaščitne prevleke za vzmetnice za košarice; Podporne blazine in klinaste blazine za košarice; Baldahini in mreže proti komarjem
nl: Meubelen > Meubelen voor baby's en peuters > Accessoires voor babybedjes en wiegjes: Wiegvoeringen en -hoezen; Wiegmatrassen; Wiegstandaards; Wieglakens en matrasbeschermers; Wiegkussens en -wiggen; Hemeltjes en klamboes
sk-SK: Nábytok > Detský nábytok > Príslušenstvo ku detským košíkom a kolískam: Vložky a poťahy do detskej postieľky a kolísky; Matrace pre detské košíky a kolísky; Stojany pre detské košíky a kolísky; Plachty a chrániče matracov do postieľky; Vankúše a kliny pre detskú postieľku; Baldachýny a moskytiéry
fr: Meubles > Mobilier pour bébés et tout-petits > Accessoires pour couffins et berceaux: Revêtements et housses pour moïses et berceaux; Matelas pour moïses et berceaux; Supports pour moïses et berceaux; Draps et protège-matelas pour moïses; Coussins de soutien et plans inclinés pour moïses; Ciels de lit et moustiquaires
ko: 가구 > 영유아 가구 > 요람/아기 침대 부대용품: 배시넷 및 크래들 라이너 및 커버; 배시넷 및 크래들 매트리스; 배시넷 및 크래들 스탠드; 배시넷 시트 및 매트리스 프로텍터; 배시넷 지지 베개 및 웨지; 캐노피 및 모기장
tr: Mobilyalar > Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Mobilyaları > Sepet Beşik ve Beşik Aksesuarları: Beşik ve sepet beşik astar ve kılıfları; Beşik ve sepet beşik yatakları; Beşik ve sepet beşik standları; Beşik çarşafları ve yatak koruyucuları; Beşik destek yastıkları ve reflü minderleri; Gölgelikler ve cibinlikler
es: Mobiliario > Mobiliario para bebés y niños pequeños > Accesorios para moisés y cunas: Protectores y fundas para moisés y cunas; Colchones para moisés y cunas; Soportes para moisés y cunas; Sábanas y protectores de colchón para moisés; Cojines y cuñas de soporte para moisés; Doseles y mosquiteros
lt-LT: Baldai > Baldai kūdikiams ir mažiems vaikams > Lopšių ir lovyčių kūdikiams priedai: Lopšių ir kūdikių lovelių įdėklai ir užvalkalai; Lopšių ir lovelių kūdikiams čiužiniai; Lopšių ir lovelių kūdikiams stovai; Lopšių paklodės ir čiužinių apsaugos; Lopšių atraminės pagalvėlės ir pleištai; Baldakimai ir tinkleliai nuo uodų
ro-RO: Mobilier > Mobilier pentru bebeluși și copii mici > Accesorii pentru pătuț și leagăn: Căptușeli și huse pentru leagăn și coșuleț; Saltele pentru leagăne și pătuțuri; Suporturi pentru leagăne și pătuțuri; Cearceafuri și protecții de saltea pentru coșuleț; Perne de susținere și pene pentru coșuleț; Baldachine și plase antițânțari
pl: Meble > Meble dla dzieci i niemowląt > Akcesoria do koszyków i kołysek: Wypełnienia i ochraniacze do kołysek; Materace do gondoli i kołysek; Stojaki pod gondole i kołyski; Prześcieradła do gondoli i ochraniacze na materac; Poduszki stabilizujące i kliny do gondoli; Baldachimy i moskitiery
el: Έπιπλα > Βρεφικά & παιδικά έπιπλα > Αξεσουάρ για λίκνα & κούνιες: Καλύμματα και επενδύσεις για καλαθούνες και κούνιες; Στρώματα για καλαθούνες και κούνιες; Βάσεις για καλαθούνες και κούνιες; Σεντόνια και προστατευτικά στρώματος για καλαθούνες; Μαξιλάρια στήριξης και σφήνες για καλαθούνες; Κουνουπιέρες
it: Arredamento > Mobili per bebè e bimbi > Accessori per culle e culle neonati: Rivestimenti e coperture per culle e portenfant; Materassi per culle e portenfant; Supporti per culle e portenfant; Lenzuola e coprimaterassi per culle; Cuscini di supporto e cunei per culle; Baldacchini e zanzariere
vi: Đồ gỗ > Đồ nội thất cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ nhỏ > Phụ kiện nôi và cũi em bé: Tấm lót & vỏ bọc nôi đứng & nôi đưa; Nệm cho nôi đứng & nôi đưa; Chân đế nôi đứng & nôi đưa; Ga trải & tấm bảo vệ nệm nôi đứng; Gối đỡ & gối nêm cho nôi đứng; Mái che & mùng chống muỗi
fi: Huonekalut > Vauvojen ja leikki-ikäisten huonekalut > Vauvansänkyjen ja kehtojen lisätarvikkeet: Kehtojen ja ensisänkyjen pehmusteet ja päälliset; Kehtojen ja ensisänkyjen patjat; Kehtojen ja ensisänkyjen jalustat; Ensisänkyjen lakanat ja patjansuojat; Ensisänkyjen tukityynyt ja kiilat; Vuodekatokset ja hyttysverkot
en: Furniture > Baby & Toddler Furniture > Bassinet & Cradle Accessories: Bassinet & Cradle Liners & Covers; Bassinet & Cradle Mattresses; Bassinet & Cradle Stands; Bassinet Sheets & Mattress Protectors; Bassinet Support Pillows & Wedges; Canopies & Mosquito Nets
hu: Bútor > Baba- és csecsemőbútorok > Mélykosár és bölcsőkiegészítők: Mózeskosár- és bölcsőbélések és -huzatok; Mózeskosár- és bölcsőmatracok; Mózeskosár- és bölcsőállványok; Mózeskosár lepedők és matracvédők; Mózeskosár tartópárnák és ékpárnák; Baldachinok és szúnyoghálók
hr-HR: Namještaj > Namještaj za bebe i malu djecu > Dodaci za krevetiće i kolijevke: Umetci i navlake za krevetić i kolijevku; Madraci za kolijevku i njihaljku; Stalci za kolijevku i njihaljku; Plahte i zaštitne navlake za madrace za krevetić; Jastuci i klinovi za podršku za krevetić; Baldahini i mreže protiv komaraca